Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF691.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2646YH (3) 91 jm/md H.F. 691 Section 1. Section 8.57E, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. Except as otherwise provided in this section , moneys 3 in the taxpayer relief fund shall only be used pursuant to 4 appropriations or transfers made by the general assembly for 5 tax relief , or reductions in income tax rates , or rebates under 6 section 425B.1 . 7 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 425B.1 Residential rebate ââ fund ââ 8 appropriation. 9 1. As used in this section, âeligibility periodâ means each 10 fiscal year commencing with the fiscal year beginning July 1, 11 2025, but before the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2030. 12 2. a. A residential rebate fund is created within the 13 state treasury under the control of the department of revenue. 14 For each fiscal year in the eligibility period, there is 15 appropriated from the taxpayer relief fund under section 8.57E 16 to the department of revenue to be credited to the residential 17 rebate fund, an amount sufficient to implement this chapter for 18 the applicable fiscal year. The department of revenue shall 19 determine the annual appropriation amount. 20 b. Moneys in fund are to be used during the eligibility 21 period to provide residential rebate payments annually to 22 qualified persons as described in this section. 23 3. a. A person owning a homestead qualifies to claim 24 a residential rebate in the amount of one thousand dollars 25 for each fiscal year of the eligibility period the person 26 claimed the homestead credit under chapter 425, in the previous 27 fiscal year. Only one rebate may be claimed for a particular 28 homestead per fiscal year. 29 b. The department shall use homestead property tax credit 30 records from county treasurers to identify and pay residential 31 rebates to qualified owners under this subsection. 32 4. a. A person renting a residence qualifies to claim a 33 residential rebate in the amount of five hundred dollars if the 34 residence is the personâs primary residence. Not more than two 35 -1- LSB 2646YH (3) 91 jm/md 1/ 3 H.F. 691 rebates may be claimed for a particular rented residence per 1 fiscal year and not more than one rebate may be claimed per 2 familial household per fiscal year. 3 b. A person who wishes to qualify for the residential 4 rebate allowed under this chapter as a renter, shall obtain the 5 appropriate forms for claiming the rebate from the department 6 of revenue. The person claiming the rebate shall file a claim 7 form, including a verified statement and designation of primary 8 residence, with the department of revenue for the year for 9 which the person is claiming the rebate. The claim shall be 10 filed no later than September 1 following the fiscal year for 11 which the person is claiming the rebate. 12 5. By January 1 following each fiscal year during the 13 eligibility period, the department of revenue shall make the 14 authorized rebate payments to persons who qualify for the 15 rebate under this chapter. 16